Hawaii statutes.
§53-33 Advances by redevelopment
corporation. A redevelopment agency may enter into a contract with a
redevelopment corporation at any time after approval of a redevelopment plan
whereby the corporation will pay or agree to pay an agreed sum or sums, or such
sums as may be necessary, to be expended by the agency in the acquisition or
clearing, or both, of real property for a redevelopment project, under such
terms as are satisfactory to the agency; provided that no contract may obligate
the agency to refund any portion of the sums so paid except such portion as may
remain unexpended after the acquisition or clearing, or both. The contract may
include an agreement to sell or lease property subject to sale or lease covered
by the redevelopment project to the redevelopment corporation after acquisition
and clearing of the land in the project. [L 1949, c 379, §16; am L 1951, c 244,
§7; RL 1955, §143-32; am L 1959, c 44, §4; HRS §53-33]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next